Wyoming, session 2026, HB0008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-2-506(e)(iii), (iv) and by creating
a new paragraph (v) is amended to read:
6-2-506. Stalking; penalty.
(e) A person convicted of stalking under subsection
(b) of this section is guilty of felony stalking punishable
by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, if:
(iii) The defendant committed the offense of
stalking in violation of any condition of probation, parole
or bail; or
(iv) The defendant committed the offense of
stalking in violation of a temporary or permanent order of
protection issued pursuant to W.S. 7-3-508, 7-3-509,
35-21-104 or 35-21-105 or pursuant to a substantially
similar law of another jurisdiction; or
(v) The defendant committed the offense of
stalking against a minor, and the defendant is not less
than eighteen (18) years old.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0008
ENROLLED ACT NO. 8, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2